zh-TW: 鬃毛等級: 最優獾毛; 豬鬃; 高山白獾毛; 馬毛; 混合獾毛; 混合豬鬃; 混合毛髮; 尼龍; 純獾毛; 銀尖獾毛; 超級獾毛; 合成; 合成柔軟纖維; 合成銀尖纖維; 雙帶獾毛; 其他
pt-BR: Grau das cerdas: Best badger; Javali; Texugo branco de alta montanha; Pelo de cavalo; Texugo misto; Javali misto; Pelo misto; Nylon; Pure badger; Silvertip badger; Super badger; Sintético; Sintético plissoft; Fibra sintética silvertip; Texugo two-band; Outro
el: Ποιότητα τριχών: Καλύτερος ασβός; Αγριόχοιρος; Λευκός ασβός υψηλού βουνού; Αλογότριχες; Μικτός ασβός; Μικτός αγριόχοιρος; Μικτή τρίχα; Νάιλον; Καθαρός ασβός; Ασβός ασημί άκρη; Σούπερ ασβός; Συνθετικό; Συνθετικό plissoft; Συνθετική ίνα ασημί άκρη; Ασβός δύο ζωνών; Άλλο
zh-CN: 刷毛等级: 优质獾毛; 野猪鬃; 高山白獾毛; 马鬃; 混合獾毛; 混合野猪鬃; 混合毛发; 尼龙; 纯獾毛; 银尖獾毛; 超级獾毛; 合成; 合成超柔纤维; 合成银尖纤维; 双色獾毛; 其他
th: เกรดขนแปรง: ขนแบดเจอร์เกรดดีที่สุด; ขนหมูป่า; ขนแบดเจอร์ขาวบนภูเขาสูง; ขนม้า; ขนแบดเจอร์ผสม; ขนหมูป่าผสม; ขนผสม; ไนลอน; ขนแบดเจอร์แท้; ขนแบดเจอร์ปลายเงิน; ขนแบดเจอร์ซูเปอร์; สังเคราะห์; สังเคราะห์พลิสซอฟต์; เส้นใยสังเคราะห์ปลายเงิน; ขนแบดเจอร์สองแถบ; อื่นๆ
nl: Haarkwaliteit: Best badger; Everzwijn; High mountain white badger; Paardenhaar; Gemengd badger; Gemengd everzwijn; Gemengd haar; Nylon; Pure badger; Silvertip badger; Super badger; Synthetisch; Synthetisch plissoft; Synthetische silvertip vezel; Two-band badger; Andere
en: Bristle grade: Best badger; Boar; High mountain white badger; Horsehair; Mixed badger; Mixed boar; Mixed hair; Nylon; Pure badger; Silvertip badger; Super badger; Synthetic; Synthetic plissoft; Synthetic silvertip fibre; Two-band badger; Other
hr-HR: Razred čekinja: Najbolji jazavac; Vepar; Visokogorski bijeli jazavac; Konjska dlaka; Miješani jazavac; Miješani vepar; Miješana dlaka; Najlon; Čisti jazavac; Srebrni vrh jazavac; Super jazavac; Sintetika; Sintetička plissoft; Sintetička vlakna srebrnog vrha; Dvotračni jazavac; Ostalo
cs: Stupeň štětin: Nejlepší jezevec; Kanec; Vysokohorský bílý jezevec; Koňské žíně; Smíšený jezevec; Smíšený kanec; Smíšené chlupy; Nylon; Čistý jezevec; Stříbrný jezevec; Super jezevec; Syntetické; Syntetické plissoft; Syntetické stříbrné vlákno; Dvoupásmový jezevec; Jiné
vi: Cấp độ lông: Lông lửng tốt nhất; Lông heo; Lông lửng trắng núi cao; Lông ngựa; Lông lửng pha; Lông heo pha; Lông pha trộn; Nylon; Lông lửng nguyên chất; Lông lửng đầu bạc; Lông lửng siêu cấp; Tổng hợp; Tổng hợp plissoft; Sợi tổng hợp đầu bạc; Lông lửng hai băng; Khác
bg-BG: Клас на косъма: Най-добър язовец; Глиган; Високопланински бял язовец; Конски косъм; Смесен язовец; Смесен глиган; Смесен косъм; Найлон; Чист язовец; Сребърен връх язовец; Супер язовец; Синтетична; Синтетичен плисофт; Синтетично влакно сребърен връх; Двулентов язовец; Други
nb: Bustgrad: Beste grevling; Villsvin; Høyfjells hvit grevling; Horsehair; Blandet grevling; Blandet villsvin; Blandet hår; Nylon; Ren grevling; Sølvspiss grevling; Super grevling; Syntetisk; Syntetisk plissoft; Syntetisk sølvspiss fiber; To-bånds grevling; Annet
sl-SI: Razred ščetin: Najboljši jazbec; Merjasec; Visokogorski beli jazbec; Konjska žima; Mešan jazbec; Mešan merjasec; Mešana dlaka; Najlon; Čisti jazbec; Srebrnokončni jazbec; Super jazbec; Sintetika; Sintetična plissoft; Sintetično srebrnokončno vlakno; Dvopasovni jazbec; Drugo
ko: 솔털 등급: 베스트 배저; 멧돼지; 하이 마운틴 화이트 배저; 말총; 혼합 배저; 혼합 멧돼지; 혼합 털; 나일론; 퓨어 배저; 실버팁 배저; 슈퍼 배저; 인조; 합성 플리소프트; 합성 실버팁 섬유; 투밴드 배저; 기타
ru: Класс щетины: Лучший барсук; Кабан; Высокогорный белый барсук; Конский волос; Смешанный барсук; Смешанный кабан; Смешанный волос; Нейлон; Чистый барсук; Серебристый барсук; Супер барсук; Синтетика; Синтетический плиссофт; Синтетическое серебристое волокно; Двухполосный барсук; Другой
de: Borstenqualität: Best Badger; Wildschwein; High Mountain White Badger; Horsehair; Gemischtes Dachshaar; Gemischtes Wildschweinhaar; Gemischtes Haar; Nylon; Pure Badger; Silvertip Badger; Super Badger; Synthetisch; Synthetisch Plissoft; Synthetische Silvertip-Faser; Two-Band Badger; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Trieda štetín: Najlepšia jazvečia srsť; Kančia srsť; Vysokohorská biela jazvečia srsť; Konské vlásie; Zmiešaná jazvečia srsť; Zmiešaná kančia srsť; Zmiešaná srsť; Nylon; Čistá jazvečia srsť; Strieborná jazvečia srsť; Super jazvečia srsť; Syntetika; Syntetická plissoft; Syntetické strieborné vlákno; Dvojpásová jazvečia srsť; Iné
hu: Sörte minősége: Legjobb borz; Vaddisznó; Magas hegyi fehér borz; Lószőr; Vegyes borz; Vegyes vaddisznó; Vegyes szőr; Nejlon; Tiszta borz; Ezüsthegyű borz; Szuper borz; Szintetikus; Szintetikus plissoft; Szintetikus ezüsthegyű szál; Kétsávos borz; Egyéb
fr: Grade de poils: Meilleur blaireau; Sanglier; Blaireau blanc de haute montagne; Crin de cheval; Blaireau mélangé; Sanglier mélangé; Poils mélangés; Nylon; Pur blaireau; Blaireau argenté; Super blaireau; Synthétique; Synthétique plissoft; Fibre synthétique argentée; Blaireau deux bandes; Autre
pt-PT: Grau das cerdas: Texugo melhor; Javali; Texugo branco de alta montanha; Crina de cavalo; Texugo misto; Javali misto; Pelo misto; Náilon; Texugo puro; Texugo ponta prateada; Texugo super; Sintético; Sintético plissoft; Fibra sintética ponta prateada; Texugo duas bandas; Outro
pl: Klasa włosia: Najlepszy borsuk; Dzik; Wysokogórski biały borsuk; Włosie końskie; Mieszany borsuk; Mieszany dzik; Mieszane włosie; Nylonowa; Czysty borsuk; Srebrny borsuk; Super borsuk; Syntetyczne; Syntetyczny plissoft; Syntetyczne włókno srebrne; Dwupasmowy borsuk; Inne
sv: Borstgrad: Bästa grävling; Vildsvin; Högt berg vit grävling; Hästhår; Blandad grävling; Blandat vildsvin; Blandat hår; Nylon; Ren grävling; Silvertopp grävling; Super grävling; Syntetisk; Syntetisk plissoft; Syntetisk silvertoppfiber; Tvåbandsgrävling; Övrigt
ja: ブリッスルグレード: ベストバジャー; イノシシ毛; ハイマウンテンホワイトバジャー; ホースヘア; ミックスバジャー; ミックスボア; ミックスヘア; ナイロン; ピュアバジャー; シルバーチップバジャー; スーパーバジャー; 合成品; 合成プリソフト; 合成シルバーチップファイバー; ツーバンドバジャー; その他
it: Grado delle setole: Tasso migliore; Cinghiale; Tasso bianco di alta montagna; Crine di cavallo; Tasso misto; Cinghiale misto; Pelo misto; Nylon; Tasso puro; Tasso punta argentata; Super tasso; Sintetico; Sintetico plissoft; Fibra sintetica punta argentata; Tasso a due bande; Altro
es: Grado de cerda: Tejón best; Jabalí; Tejón blanco de alta montaña; Horsehair; Tejón mixto; Jabalí mixto; Pelo mixto; Nylon; Tejón puro; Tejón silvertip; Tejón súper; Sintético; Sintético plissoft; Fibra sintética silvertip; Tejón de dos bandas; Otros
lt-LT: Šerių klasė: Geriausias barsukas; Šernas; Aukštikalnių baltasis barsukas; Ašutinis audinys; Mišrus barsukas; Mišrus šernas; Mišrūs plaukai; Nailonas; Grynas barsukas; Sidabrinė viršūnė barsuko; Super barsukas; Sintetika; Sintetinis plissoft; Sintetinis sidabrinis pluoštas; Dviejų juostų barsukas; Kita
ro-RO: Calitate perilor: Bursuc de calitate superioară; Mistreț; Bursuc alb de munte înalt; Horsehair; Bursuc mixt; Mistreț mixt; Păr mixt; Nailon; Bursuc pur; Bursuc silvertip; Bursuc super; Sintetic; Sintetic plissoft; Fibră sintetică silvertip; Bursuc cu două benzi; Altele
da: Børstegrad: Best badger; Vildsvin; High mountain white badger; Horsehair; Blandet grævling; Blandet vildsvin; Blandet hår; Nylon; Pure badger; Silvertip badger; Super badger; Syntetisk; Syntetisk plissoft; Syntetisk silvertip fiber; Two-band badger; Andet
fi: Harjaksen laatu: Paras mäyrä; Villisika; Vuoriston valkoinen mäyrä; Jouhi; Sekoitettu mäyrä; Sekoitettu villisika; Sekoitettu karva; Nailon; Puhdas mäyrä; Hopeakärkimäyrä; Supermäyrä; Synteettinen; Synteettinen plissoft; Synteettinen hopeakärkikuitu; Kaksivyömäyrä; Muu
tr: Kıl sınıfı: En iyi porsuk; Domuz kılı; Yüksek dağ beyaz porsuk; At saçı; Karışık porsuk; Karışık domuz kılı; Karışık kıl; Plastik; Saf porsuk; Gümüş uçlu porsuk; Süper porsuk; Sentetik; Sentetik plissoft; Sentetik gümüş uçlu lif; İki bantlı porsuk; Diğer